Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 3. City Utility Tax Law.

§ 21-33-201.
Citation of article.

This article may be cited as the City Utility Tax Law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10109-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1960.

§ 21-33-203.
Levying of tax; exemptions.

In addition to the taxes now or hereafter provided by law, there is hereby levied upon, assessed to and shall be collected from all telephone or communication utilities as defined by Section 77-3-1, Mississippi Code of 1972 and regulated under said Section 77-3-1, an additional tax of two per cent of the gross amount of revenue made and collected on local business from customers within the corporate limits of any municipality of the State of Mississippi, which qualifies as provided by the City Utility Tax Law. Such public utility shall add to the sales price of its service the amount of any tax due under the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law to the extent that such tax was not included as a part of the cost of furnishing services in the fixing of the rates and charges for such service by the Mississippi Public Service Commission. The tax levied herein shall not apply to the cash receipts collected through coin boxes or other mechanical devices where it is impracticable to render periodic statements and thereby add the tax to the sales price of its service.

Any such public utility which pays any municipality of the State of Mississippi the compensation provided for in municipal franchises or levied and provided for by Section 77-3-17, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be exempt from the tax herein imposed and from the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law. In addition, any such public utility which makes payment of the tax imposed herein shall not be required to make payments, if any, which may be required under the terms of said Section 77-3-17.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10109-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1960.

§ 21-33-205.
Collection of tax and payment to municipality.

The city utility taxes provided for in Section 21-33-203 shall be collected by the chairman of the state tax commission and shall be accounted for separately from the amount of all other taxes collected for the state and city in said municipality. Said taxes shall be paid to the municipality in which collected, less five per cent thereof which shall be retained by the chairman and paid into a special fund to be expended by the chairman to defray the cost of carrying out the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law. Payments to the municipalities shall be made by the chairman on or before the fifteenth day of the month following the month in which the tax was collected. When so paid, the money may be expended by the municipalities for any purpose now authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10109-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 455, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1960.

§ 21-33-207.
Procedure for imposition of tax.

The mayor and board of aldermen or other governing authority of any municipality desiring to avail itself of the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law shall adopt an ordinance declaring its intention to have the utility tax imposed at the specified rate for the benefit of such municipality effective on and after a date fixed in the ordinance which must be at least thirty (30) days later and on the first day of a month. A certified copy of this ordinance shall be immediately forwarded to the Chairman of the State Tax Commission. The municipal authorities shall have a copy of the ordinance published once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in the municipality and having a general circulation therein. The first publication shall be not less than twenty-eight (28) days prior to the levying date fixed in such ordinance, and the last publication shall be made not less than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in the municipality, then notice shall be given by publishing the ordinance for the required time in some newspaper published in the same or an adjoining county having a general circulation in the municipality. A copy of the ordinance shall also be posted at three (3) public places in the municipality for a period of at least twenty-one (21) days during the time of its publication in a newspaper. The publication of the ordinance may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. Proof of publication must also be furnished to the Chairman of the State Tax Commission.

If more than twenty percent (20%) of the qualified electors of the municipality having no city utility tax shall file with the clerk of the municipality within twenty-one (21) days after adoption of the ordinance of intent to qualify for the collection of the tax, a petition requesting an election on the question of the levy of such tax, then and in that event such tax levy shall not be made unless authorized by a majority of the votes cast at an election to be called and held for that purpose. Notice of such election shall be given, the election shall be held and the result thereof determined in the manner provided in Title 21, Chapter 11, of the Mississippi Code of 1972. In the event of an election resulting in favor of the levy or where no election is required, the governing authorities shall adopt another ordinance qualifying for the collection of the tax provided in the City Utility Tax Law, and shall set the first of a month following the date of such adoption as the effective date of the tax levy. A certified copy of this ordinance together with the result of the election, if any, shall be immediately furnished the Chairman of the State Tax Commission. Upon receipt of the certified ordinance and other official notice from the municipality, the chairman shall notify the utilities in such municipality which are affected by the City Utility Tax Law, and take the necessary action to collect the tax. The first payment of the tax after its adoption shall be on all receipts of the utility derived from all billings made fifteen (15) days after the effective date of said adoption.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10109-04; Laws, 1960, ch. 455, § 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 6, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 21-33-209.
Procedure for discontinuance of tax.

Any qualified municipality wishing to discontinue the collection of the city utility tax may do so by an action of the mayor and board of aldermen or other governing authority adopting an ordinance to that effect. Such ordinance shall be effective after the last day of a month and the tax levy shall not apply to sales made on and after said date. A copy of the ordinance shall be furnished to the chairman of the state tax commission at least seven days prior to its effective date.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10109-05; Laws, 1960, ch. 455, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1960.

§ 21-33-211.
Administration of City Utility Tax Law.

All administrative provisions of Chapter 65 of Title 27 of the Mississippi Code of 1972, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of sales tax and for noncompliance with the provisions of said chapter and all other requirements and duties imposed upon the taxpayer, shall apply to all persons liable for city utility taxes under the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law. The chairman shall exercise all power and authority and perform all duties with respect to taxpayers under the City Utility Tax Law as are provided in said chapter, except where there is conflict, then the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law shall control. Any damages, penalties, or interest collected for the nonpayment of taxes, or for noncompliance with the provisions of the City Utility Tax Law, shall be paid to the municipality in which said damages were collected on the same basis and in the same manner as the tax. Any overpayment of tax for any reason that has been disbursed to any municipality or any payment of the tax to any municipality in error may be adjusted by the chairman on any subsequent payment to the municipality involved pursuant to the provisions of the said chapter. The chairman may from time to time make such rules and regulations not inconsistent with the City Utility Tax Law as may be deemed necessary to carry out its provisions and such rules and regulations shall have the full force and effect of law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10109-06; Laws, 1960, ch. 455, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1960.